Hawaii statutes.
[§481H-4] Disclosure. No person shall
sell, offer for sale, rent, lease, or distribute any water treatment unit for
use in this State unless written material which provides the following
information is included with each unit:

(1) The name and mailing address of the manufacturer
or distributor;

(2) The name, brand, or trademark under which the
unit is sold, and its model number;

(3) A statement listing all contaminants the unit is
capable of reducing from the water;

(4) The specifications of the unit, including:

(A) The filter life, if applicable;

(B) The approximate capacity of the unit,
expressed in gallons or period of time, if applicable;

(C) A summary of recommended operational
procedures and requirements necessary for the proper operation of the unit,
including, but not limited to:

(i) Electrical requirements;

(ii) Maximum and minimum operation pressure;

(iii) Maximum operating temperature;

(iv) Flow rate;

(v) Maintenance requirements;

(vi) Replacement frequencies; and

(vii) An explanation of any performance
indicator, if available;

(5) Installation instructions;

(6) The manufacturer's warranty and guarantee, if
applicable;

(7) A statement that performance of the water
treatment unit may vary based on local water conditions;

(8) A statement that the unit is only intended for
use with potable water, if true; and

(9) A statement that all the contaminants reduced by
the unit are not necessarily in the user's water supply, if true. [L 1991, c
260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next